Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1520.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [471.9994] LANDLORD-TENANT GUIDE. new text end new text begin A home rule charter, statutory city, or town shall provide, when a rental license is issued or renewed, a physical copy of the attorney general's landlord-tenant guide or, if the rental license is renewed or issued electronically, a link to the guide on the attorney general's website. new text end